Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201575-330
Noncompete provision.

A transportation network company shall not require a participating driver to sign an agreement not to compete with the company in order to be matched with passengers through the company's online-enabled application or platform.

Laws 2015, LB629, § 9.